Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1827.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28A.300.040 and 2023 c 303 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the powers and duties of the superintendent of public instruction shall be:(1) To have supervision over all matters pertaining to the public schools of the state;(2) To report to the governor and the legislature such information and data as may be required for the management and improvement of the schools;(3) To prepare and have printed such forms, registers, courses of study, rules for the government of the common schools, and such other material and books as may be necessary for the discharge of the duties of teachers and officials charged with the administration of the laws relating to the common schools, and to distribute the same to educational service district superintendents;(4) To travel, without neglecting his or her other official duties as superintendent of public instruction, for the purpose of attending educational meetings or conventions, of visiting schools, and of consulting educational service district superintendents or other school officials;(5) To prepare and from time to time to revise a manual of the Washington state common school code, copies of which shall be made available online and which shall be sold at approximate actual cost of publication and distribution per volume to public and nonpublic agencies or individuals, said manual to contain Titles 28A and 28C RCW, rules related to the common schools, and such other matter as the state superintendent or the state board of education shall determine;(6) To file all papers, reports and public documents transmitted to the superintendent by the school officials of the several counties or districts of the state, each year separately. Copies of all papers filed in the superintendent's office, and the superintendent's official acts, may, or upon request, shall be certified by the superintendent and attested by the superintendent's official seal, and when so certified shall be evidence of the papers or acts so certified to;(7) To require annually, on or before the 15th day of August, of the president, manager, or principal of every educational institution in this state, a report as required by the superintendent of public instruction; and it is the duty of every president, manager, or principal, to complete and return such forms within such time as the superintendent of public instruction shall direct;(8) To keep in the superintendent's office a record of all teachers receiving certificates to teach in the common schools of this state;(9) To issue certificates as provided by law;(10) To keep in the superintendent's office at the capital of the state, all books and papers pertaining to the business of the superintendent's office, and to keep and preserve in the superintendent's office a complete record of statistics, as well as a record of the meetings of the state board of education;(11) With the assistance of the office of the attorney general, to decide all points of law which may be submitted to the superintendent in writing by any educational service district superintendent, or that may be submitted to the superintendent by any other person, upon appeal from the decision of any educational service district superintendent; and the superintendent shall publish his or her rulings and decisions from time to time for the information of school officials and teachers; and the superintendent's decision shall be final unless set aside by a court of competent jurisdiction;(12) To administer oaths and affirmations in the discharge of the superintendent's official duties;(13) To deliver to his or her successor, at the expiration of the superintendent's term of office, all records, books, maps, documents and papers of whatever kind belonging to the superintendent's office or which may have been received by the superintendent's for the use of the superintendent's office;(14) To administer family services and programs to promote the state's policy as provided in RCW 74.14A.025;(15) To promote the adoption of school-based curricula and policies that provide quality, daily physical education for all students, and to encourage policies that provide all students with opportunities for physical activity outside of formal physical education classes;(16) To ((perform all duties required by chapter 303, Laws of 2023 for the))ensure the effective delivery and ((oversight))administration of basic education services to justice-involved students ((under the age of 21 who are served through institutional education programs in facilities that are not under the jurisdiction of the department of social and health services or the department of corrections))and to improve their educational outcomes, both as required by RCW 28A.190.150; and(17) To perform such other duties as may be required by law.Sec. 2. RCW 28A.300.850 and 2023 c 303 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop a timeline and plan for assuming, by September 1, ((2027))2028, responsibility for the effective delivery and administration of basic education services to justice-involved students ((who are under the age of 21 and served through institutional education programs in facilities that are not under the jurisdiction of the department of social and health services or the department of corrections))and improving their educational outcomes.(b) The timeline and plan ((shall))required by this section must consider:(i) The findings and recommendations produced in accordance with section 2, chapter 303, Laws of 2023; ((recommendations))(ii) Recommendations provided in the December 1, 2022, improving institutional education outcomes final report of the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of children, youth, and families; ((staffing transitions for educators and staff that, as of July 23, 2023,))(iii) Educators and staff that deliver education programming and services to the justice-involved students; and ((legislation))(iv) Legislation enacted in 2024 and in subsequent years relating to the superintendent's requirements under RCW 28A.190.150.(2) Beginning December 15, 2023, and annually thereafter through ((2026))2027, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, provide an interim report on progress made in achieving the requirements of this section to the governor and the education and fiscal committees of the legislature.(3) In meeting the requirements of this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall ((consult)):(a) Consult with organizations representing ((educators and staff that deliver))those who deliver, support, and receive education programming and services to justice-involved students ((who are under the age of 21 and served through institutional education programs in facilities that are not under the jurisdiction of the department of social and health services or the department of corrections));(b) Implement the research and analysis recommendations for the two service delivery and governance options identified in the final report required by section 2, chapter 303, Laws of 2023;(c) Examine an additional service delivery and governance option that preserves the role of school districts in providing basic education services to justice-involved students, but includes additional state direction in furtherance of the recommendations referenced in subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section and those provided in accordance with section 2, chapter 226, Laws of 2020;(d) Describe how the office of the superintendent of public instruction will ensure the effective delivery and administration of basic education services to justice-involved students as required by RCW 28A.190.150; and(e) Make recommendations for statutory or other changes needed to ensure proper oversightÂ of the delivery and administration of basic education services to justice-involved students. Recommendations made in accordance with this subsection (e) must address comments and recommendations related to education delivery outcome and progress measurements provided by educators in accordance with this section.(4) For the purposes of this section, "justice-involved students" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.190.150.(((4)))(5) This section expires June 30, ((2027))2028.Sec. 3. RCW 28A.190.150 and 2023 c 303 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Beginning September 1, ((2027))2028, the superintendent of public instruction is responsible for ((the))ensuring the effective delivery and ((oversight))administration of basic education services to justice-involved students ((are who [who are]))and improving the educational outcomes of those students.(2) For the purposes of this section, "justice-involved students" means students who are under the age of 21, or as otherwise required by law, and served through institutional education programs in accordance with RCW 28A.150.200 in facilities that are not under the jurisdiction of the department of social and health services or the department of corrections.(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt, and periodically revise as necessary, rules to implement this section.--- END ---